apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
          <l>жещо</l>
          <r>га<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гащи</l>
          <r>га<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>жещи</l>
          <r>га<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гане</l>
          <r>га<s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="да/д__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дох</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дохме</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>де</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дохте</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>де</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>доха</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>л</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ла</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ло</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ли</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дейки</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йте</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ден</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дена</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дено</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дени</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дях</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дяхме</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>деше</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дяхте</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>деше</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дяха</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дял</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дяла</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дяло</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дяли</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>м</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дем</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>деш</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дете</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>де</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дат</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дящ</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дяща</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дящо</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дящи</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дене</l>
          <r>д<s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="дад"><i>да</i><par n="да/д__vblex"/></e>
